Illinois, session 104th, HB3634.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Consumer Installment Loan Act is amended by 5changing Section 17.5 as follows: 6    (205 ILCS 670/17.5)7    Sec. 17.5. Consumer reporting service.8    (a) For the purpose of this Section, "certified database" 9means the consumer reporting service database established 10pursuant to the Payday Loan Reform Act. "Title-secured loan" 11means a loan in which, at commencement, a consumer provides to 12the licensee, as security for the loan, physical possession of 13the consumer's title to a motor vehicle.14    (b) Licensees shall enter information regarding each loan 15into the certified database and shall follow the Department's 16related rules.17    (c) For every title-secured loan made, the licensee shall 18input information as provided in 38 Ill. Adm. Code 110.420.19    (d) The certified database provider shall indemnify the 20licensee against all claims and actions arising from illegal 21or willful or wanton acts on the part of the certified database 22provider. The certified database provider may charge a fee not 23to exceed the lesser of $1 or 0.1% of the loan principal for   HB3634- 2 -LRB104 09203 BAB 19260 b1each loan entered into the certified database. The database 2provider shall not charge any additional fees or charges to 3the licensee.4(Source: P.A. 101-658, eff. 3-23-21.) 5    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 6becoming law.